Hawaii statutes.
PART XI.
DERIVATIVE ACTIONS

[§428-1101] Right of action. A member
of a limited liability company may maintain an action in the right of the
company if the members or managers having authority to do so have refused to
commence the action or an effort to cause those members or managers to commence
the action is not likely to succeed. [L 1996, c 92, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next